Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1077.
do enact as follows:SB1077,11Section 1. 609.865 of the statutes is created to read:SB1077,2,42609.865 Coverage of prosthetic limbs and custom orthotic braces. 3Limited service health organizations, preferred provider plans, and defined 4network plans are subject to s. 632.895 (16g).SB1077,25Section 2. 632.895 (16g) of the statutes is created to read:SB1077,2,76632.895 (16g) Prosthetic limbs and custom orthotic braces. (a) In this 7subsection:SB1077,2,981. “Custom orthotic brace” means an external medical device that meets all of 9the following conditions:SB1077,2,1110a. The device is fabricated or custom fitted to support, correct, or alleviate 11neuromuscular or musculoskeletal dysfunction, disease, injury, or deformity.SB1077,2,1212b. The device is personalized based on the patient’s unique physical condition.SB1077,2,14132. “Insured” includes an enrollee under a self-insured health plan of the state 14or a county, city, village, town, or school district.SB1077,2,16153. “Prosthesis” means an external medical device that meets all of the 16following conditions:SB1077,3,21a. The device is custom designed, fabricated, fitted, or modified, or any 2combination thereof.SB1077,3,53b. The device is used to replace or restore a missing limb or portion of a limb, 4used to restore physiological function or cosmesis due to a missing limb, or used for 5any combination thereof.SB1077,3,96(b) Subject to pars. (c) to (i), every disability insurance policy, and every self-7insured health plan of the state or a county, city, village, town, or school district, 8shall provide coverage for one or more prostheses per limb and one or more custom 9orthotic braces per limb when any of the following conditions are met:SB1077,3,12101. An insured’s appropriate licensed health care provider determines that the 11prosthesis or custom orthotic brace is the most appropriate prosthetic or orthotic 12device that is medically necessary for the insured to do any of the following:SB1077,3,1313a. Participate in activities of daily living or essential job-related activities.SB1077,3,1514b. Perform physical activities, including running, biking, swimming, and 15strength training, for maximizing lower limb function or upper limb function.SB1077,3,18162. An insured’s appropriate licensed health care provider determines that the 17prosthesis or custom orthotic device is the most appropriate prosthetic or orthotic 18device that meets the insured’s medical needs for purposes of showering or bathing.SB1077,3,2219(c) Coverage under par. (b) shall, at a minimum, equal the coverage and 20payment for prosthetic and orthotic devices provided under federal programs 21pursuant to 42 USC 1395k, 1395l, and 1395m and 42 CFR 410.100, 414.202, 22414.210, and 414.228.SB1077,4,323(d) Coverage under par. (b) shall include the materials, components, and 24related services necessary to use the prosthesis or custom orthotic brace described 1in par. (b) for its intended purpose; any instruction provided to the insured on using 2the prosthesis or custom orthotic brace; and the reasonable repair of the prosthesis 3or orthotic custom brace, or a part thereof.SB1077,4,74(e) Coverage under par. (b) shall include the replacement or repair, other than 5a repair covered under par. (d), of a prosthesis or custom orthotic brace described in 6par. (b), or a part thereof, without regard to continuous use or useful lifetime 7restrictions, if any of the following conditions are met:SB1077,4,1081. The repair or replacement is medically necessary due to a change in the 9physiological condition of the insured or an irreparable change in the condition of 10the prosthesis or custom orthotic brace, or a part thereof.SB1077,4,13112. The prosthesis or custom orthotic brace, or a part thereof, requires repair 12and the repair cost exceeds 60 percent of the replacement cost of the prosthesis, 13custom orthotic brace, or part.SB1077,4,1714(f) For coverage under par. (e), a policy or plan may require confirmation from 15an appropriate licensed health care provider that a condition in par. (e) 1. or 2. is 16satisfied if a prosthesis, custom orthotic brace, or part being replaced is less than 3 17years old.SB1077,4,2118(g) Coverage required under this subsection may be subject to normal 19utilization management and prior authorization practices. Any denial of coverage 20under this paragraph shall be issued in writing and include a detailed explanation 21of the reason for the denial.SB1077,5,222(h) Any denial of coverage under this subsection based on medical necessity 23shall be issued in writing and include a detailed explanation of the reason for the 1denial, including a description of why the request or claim for coverage does not 2meet medical necessity standards.SB1077,5,53(i) Coverage under par. (b) may be subject only to the cost-sharing provisions 4that apply generally to the coverage provided under the policy or plan for inpatient 5physician and surgical services.SB1077,5,126(j) A managed care plan that provides coverage subject to this subsection 7shall ensure access to medically necessary clinical care, and prostheses and custom 8orthotic braces and technology, from no less than 2 providers in the plan’s network 9located in this state. If the care and services are not available from an in-network 10provider, the plan shall provide a process to refer an insured to an out-of-network 11provider and shall fully reimburse the out-of-network provider at a mutually agreed 12upon rate less the cost sharing determined on an in-network basis.SB1077,313Section 3. Initial applicability.SB1077,5,1614(1) For policies and plans containing provisions inconsistent with this act, this 15act first applies to policy or plan years beginning on the effective date of this 16subsection, except as provided in sub. (2).SB1077,5,2117(2) For policies and plans that are affected by a collective bargaining 18agreement containing provisions inconsistent with this act, this act first applies to 19policy or plan years beginning on the effective date of this subsection or on the day 20on which the collective bargaining agreement is newly established, extended, 21modified, or renewed, whichever is later.SB1077,422Section 4. Effective date.SB1077,6,21(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 4th month beginning after 2publication.SB1077,6,33